ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنتن
SFX	W3	Y	15
SFX	W3	ن	نه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	W3	أ	أنه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W3	ئ	أنه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W3	اء	ؤنه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W3	ءى	ئينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W3	أى	ئينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W3	أى	ئينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W3	آ	ؤونه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W3	ا	ونه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	W3	ا	ينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[ي]ا
SFX	W3	و	ونه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W3	ى	ينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W3	ي	ينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W3	ئي	أينه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W3	0	نه/Jah0b0c0i0X0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،-الصنف-الثاني-SFX---05/01/02-=-520-521-522
#يتعلق-الأمر-هنا-بالأفعال-التالية:1-2--13-18-26-27-28-37-38-46-57-65-66-67-72-80-81-82-90-95-99-106-112-114-122-124

#أنتَ
SFX	W4	Y	13
SFX	W4	0	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W4	ئ	أه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W4	اء	ؤه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W4	ءى	ئه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W4	أى	ئه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W4	أى	ئه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W4	آ	ؤه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W4	ا	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W4	و	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W4	ى	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W4	ي	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W4	ئي	أه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W4	0	ه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	W5	Y	39
SFX	W5	أ	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W5	ئ	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W5	اء	وئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W5	ءى	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W5	أى	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W5	أى	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W5	آ	ئيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W5	ا	يه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W5	و	يه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W5	ى	يه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W5	ي	يه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W5	ئي	أيه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W5	0	يه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W5	أ	آه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W5	ئ	آه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W5	اء	وءاه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W5	ءى	ئياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W5	أى	ئياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W5	أى	ئياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W5	آ	ؤواه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W5	ا	واه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W5	و	واه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W5	ى	ياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W5	ي	ياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W5	ئي	أياه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W5	0	اه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W5	أ	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W5	ئ	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W5	اء	وؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W5	ءى	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W5	أى	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W5	أى	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W5	آ	ؤوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W5	ا	وه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W5	و	وه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W5	ى	وه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W5	ي	وه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W5	ئي	أوه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W5	0	وه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	W6	Y	14
SFX	W6	ن	نه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	W6	أ	أنه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W6	ئ	أنه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W6	اء	ؤنه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W6	ءى	ئينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W6	أى	ئينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W6	أى	ئينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W6	آ	ؤونه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W6	ا	ونه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W6	و	ونه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W6	ى	ينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W6	ي	ينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W6	ئي	أينه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W6	0	نه/Jbh0b0c0i0X0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،-الصنف-الثالث-#SFX---05/01/03-=-530-531-532
#يتعلق-الأمر-هنا-بالأفعال-التالية:17-47--68--70--75-77-78--81-92-93-94-96-97-113-115-123

#أنتَ
SFX	W7	Y	13
SFX	W7	0	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W7	ئ	أه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W7	اء	ؤه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W7	ءى	ئه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W7	أى	ئه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W7	أى	ئه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W7	آ	ؤه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W7	ا	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W7	و	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W7	ى	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W7	ي	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W7	ئي	أه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W7	0	ه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	W8	Y	39
SFX	W8	أ	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W8	ئ	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W8	اء	وئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W8	ءى	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W8	أى	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W8	أى	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W8	آ	ئيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W8	ا	يه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W8	و	يه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W8	ى	يه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W8	ي	يه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W8	ئي	أيه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W8	0	يه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W8	أ	آه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W8	ئ	آه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W8	اء	وءاه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W8	ءى	ئياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W8	أى	ئياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W8	أى	ئياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W8	آ	ؤواه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W8	ا	واه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W8	و	واه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W8	ى	ياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W8	ي	ياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W8	ئي	أياه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W8	0	اه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W8	أ	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W8	ئ	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W8	اء	وؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W8	ءى	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W8	أى	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W8	أى	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W8	آ	ؤوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W8	ا	وه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W8	و	وه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W8	ى	وه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W8	ي	وه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W8	ئي	أوه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W8	0	وه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	W9	Y	14
SFX	W9	ن	نه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	W9	أ	أنه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W9	ئ	أنه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W9	اء	ؤنه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W9	ءى	ئينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W9	أى	ئينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W9	أى	ئينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W9	آ	ؤونه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W9	ا	ونه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W9	و	ونه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W9	ى	ينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W9	ي	ينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W9	ئي	أينه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W9	0	نه/Jch0b0c0i0X0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،-الصنف-الرابع-#SFX---05/01/04-=-540-541-542
#يتعلق-الأمر-هنا-بالأفعال-التالية:19--69--74--78-83

#أنتَ
SFX	W$	Y	13
SFX	W$	0	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W$	ئ	أه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W$	اء	ؤه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W$	ءى	ئه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W$	أى	ئه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W$	أى	ئه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W$	آ	ؤه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W$	ا	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W$	و	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W$	ى	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W$	ي	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W$	ئي	أه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W$	0	ه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	W@	Y	39
SFX	W@	أ	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W@	ئ	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W@	اء	وئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W@	ءى	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W@	أى	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W@	أى	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W@	آ	ئيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W@	ا	يه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W@	و	يه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W@	ى	يه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W@	ي	يه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W@	ئي	أيه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W@	0	يه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W@	أ	آه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W@	ئ	آه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W@	اء	وءاه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W@	ءى	ئياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W@	أى	ئياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W@	أى	ئياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W@	آ	ؤواه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W@	ا	واه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W@	و	واه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W@	ى	ياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W@	ي	ياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W@	ئي	أياه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W@	0	اه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	W@	أ	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W@	ئ	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W@	اء	وؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W@	ءى	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W@	أى	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W@	أى	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W@	آ	ؤوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W@	ا	وه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W@	و	وه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W@	ى	وه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W@	ي	وه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W@	ئي	أوه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W@	0	وه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنتن
SFX	W&	Y	14
SFX	W&	ن	نه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	W&	أ	أنه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W&	ئ	أنه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W&	اء	ؤنه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W&	ءى	ئينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W&	أى	ئينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W&	أى	ئينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W&	آ	ؤونه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W&	ا	ونه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W&	و	ونه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W&	ى	ينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W&	ي	ينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W&	ئي	أينه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W&	0	نه/Jdh0b0c0i0X0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الأولى،-الصنف-الخامس-#SFX---05/01/05-=-550-551-552
#يتعلق-الأمر-هنا-بالأفعال-التالية:68

#أنتَ
SFX	W(	Y	13
SFX	W(	0	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	W(	ئ	أه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	W(	اء	ؤه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	W(	ءى	ئه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	W(	أى	ئه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	W(	أى	ئه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	W(	آ	ؤه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	W(	ا	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	ا
SFX	W(	و	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	W(	ى	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	W(	ي	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	W(	ئي	أه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	W(	0	ه/Jeh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
